Utah statutes.
32B-10-704.   Health care practitioner exemption.

(1)  This section applies to an individual who:

(a) (i)  is a health care practitioner; or

(ii)  is a veterinarian licensed under Title 58, Chapter 28, Veterinary Practice Act;

(b)  is acting within the scope of individual's professional responsibility; and

(c)  in a professional capacity, prescribes, prepares, or administers an alcoholic product to a person being treated or within the scope of the health care practitioner's license authority.

(2)  A person described in Subsection (1):

(a)  is not in violation of this title; and

(b)  is not required to hold any type of license or permit to use an alcoholic product professionally.

